Massachusetts, session 194th, S23.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding Section 8C of Chapter 40 of the General Laws, the
Select Board may appoint up to 2 alternate members to the Conservation Commission for terms
not to exceed 3 years.
(b) The Chair of the Conservation Commission may designate an alternate member to sit
on the Commission in the case of absence, inability to act, or conflict of interest on the part of a
member of the Commission, or in the event of a vacancy on the Commission, until the vacancy is
filled, or take any action relative thereto.
of 1